Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-308
Board, defined.

Prior to July 1, 2026, board means the Board of Alcohol and Drug Counseling. Beginning July 1, 2026, board means the Board of Mental Health Practice.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 159;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 10.